test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-plex_skerreeh_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  Noun - skerreeh: # MLO, ok; váilu: skerreeskuáppu
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Nom: skerreeh
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Gen: skerrei
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Acc: skerreid
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Ill: skerreid
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Loc: skerrein
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Com: skerreiguin
    skerreeh+N+Pl+Abe: skerreittáá

  Noun - stiváh: # MLO, ok; váilu: stivápuuvsah
    stiváh+N+Pl+Nom: stiváh
    stiváh+N+Pl+Gen: stivái
    stiváh+N+Pl+Acc: stiváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Ill: stiváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Loc: stiváin
    stiváh+N+Pl+Com: stiváiguin
    stiváh+N+Pl+Abe: stiváittáá
